Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13.5 ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE FOR CHILD SUPPORT ESTABLISHMENT AND ENFORCEMENT
26-13.5-110. Paternity - establishment - filing of order with court.

The delegate child support enforcement unit may issue an order establishing paternity of and financial responsibility for a child in the course of a support proceeding pursuant to this article 13.5 when a parent signs a statement that the paternity of the child for whom support is sought has not been legally established and that the parents are the legal parents of the child and if neither parent is contesting the issue of paternity or may issue a default order establishing paternity and financial responsibility in accordance with section 26-13.5-106. Prior to issuing an order pursuant to this section, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall advise both parents in writing as prescribed by rule promulgated pursuant to section 26-13.5-113 of their legal rights concerning the determination of paternity.

A copy of the order establishing paternity and financial responsibility and the sworn statement of the parent and, in the case of a default order establishing paternity and financial responsibility, the APA-petitioner's verified affidavit regarding paternity and the genetic test results, if any, must be filed with the clerk of the district court in the county in which the notice of financial responsibility was issued or as otherwise provided in accordance with section 26-13.5-105 (2). The order establishing paternity and financial responsibility has all the force, effect, and remedies of an order of the district court, and the order may be executed upon and enforced in the same manner as an order of the court.

If the order establishing paternity is at variance with the child's birth certificate, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall order that a new birth certificate be issued pursuant to section 19-4-124.

Service of process to establish paternity and financial responsibility may be made pursuant to this article 13.5 by any method of service, including certified mail, as specified in section 26-13.5-104.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1245, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 899, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 186, § 8, effective August 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 565, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2332, § 10, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-110.5. Filing genetic testing results with court - no administrative process action order.

Whenever genetic testing has been conducted pursuant to section 26-13.5-105 and the results show a less than ninety-seven percent probability of parentage, and the delegate child support enforcement unit issues a notice or order of dismissal of the APA case, the genetic testing results must be filed with the clerk of the district court in the county in which the notice of financial responsibility was issued, when there is a court action relating to child support pending, or where an order exists but is silent on the issue of child support.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article 13.5 to the contrary, the court has jurisdiction to receive an objection to genetic test results and to take any other appropriate action relating to such test results.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2333, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-111. Establishment and enforcement of duties of support upon request of agency of another state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1245, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 1607, § 14, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 1271, § 65, effective April 22.

26-13.5-112. Modification of an order.

At any time after the entry of an order of financial responsibility or an order of default pursuant to this article 13.5, in order to add, alter, or delete any provisions to such an order, the delegate child support enforcement unit may issue a notice of financial responsibility modification to the obligor and obligee advising the obligor and obligee of the possible modification of the existing administrative order issued pursuant to this article 13.5. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall serve the obligor and the obligee with a notice of financial responsibility modification by first-class mail or by electronic means if mutually agreed upon. The obligor or the obligee may file a written request for modification of an administrative order issued pursuant to this article 13.5 with the delegate child support enforcement unit. If the delegate child support enforcement unit denies the request for modification based upon the failure to demonstrate a showing of changed circumstances required pursuant to section 14-10-122, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall advise the requesting party of the party's right to seek a modification pursuant to section 14-10-122.

(1.2) At any time after entry of an administrative order issued pursuant to this article, an obligor or obligee may file a written request for review of the order with the delegate child support enforcement unit. The written request for review shall include financial information of the requesting party necessary to conduct a calculation pursuant to the Colorado child support guidelines described in section 14-10-115, C.R.S. The requesting party shall provide his or her financial information on the form required by the division of child support enforcement. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall review each request received and grant or deny the request using the standards described in section 26-13-121 (2)(a) or (2)(b).

(1.3) If there is an active assignment of rights, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall, once every thirty-six months, review the administrative order to determine if an adjustment of the administrative order is appropriate.

(1.4) If the request for review is granted or in case of an automatic review where there is an active assignment of rights, a notice of review shall be issued to the requesting and nonrequesting parties. In the case of a review in which there is an active assignment of rights, the obligor and obligee shall be considered nonrequesters. The notice of review shall advise the obligor and obligee that a review is to be conducted and provide the nonrequesters twenty days within which to provide the financial information necessary to calculate the child support obligation pursuant to the Colorado child support guidelines described in section 14-10-115, C.R.S.

(1.5) (a) The review of the administrative order must be conducted on or before the thirtieth day after notice of review is sent to the parties. During the review, the determination of the monthly support obligation must be based on the child support guidelines set forth in section 14-10-115. The delegate child support enforcement unit may grant a continuance of the review for good cause. The continuance must be for a reasonable period of time to be determined by the delegate child support enforcement unit, not to exceed thirty days.

In order to obtain information necessary to conduct the review, the delegate child support enforcement unit is authorized, pursuant to sections 26-13.5-103 (1) and 26-13-121 (3)(d), to serve, by first-class mail, hand delivery, or by electronic means if mutually agreed upon, an administrative subpoena to any person, corporation, partnership, public employee retirement benefit plan, financial institution, labor union, or other entity to appear or for the production of records and financial documents.

An adjustment to the administrative order is appropriate only if the standard set forth in section 14-10-122 (1)(b) is met.

(1.7) (a) After the review is completed, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide a post-review notice and child support guideline worksheet advising the obligor and obligee of the review results. If a review indicates that an adjustment should be made, a notice of financial responsibility and a proposed order of financial responsibility shall be included. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide all supporting financial documentation used to calculate the monthly support obligation to both parties. The notice of financial responsibility shall advise the parties of the right to challenge the post-review notice of the review results, the time frame for challenging the review results, and the method for asserting the challenge.

The obligor and obligee must be given fifteen days after the date of the post-review notice to challenge the review results. The grounds for the challenge are limited to the issue of mathematical or factual error in the calculation of the monthly support obligation. The delegate child support enforcement unit may grant an extension of up to fifteen days to challenge the review results based upon a showing of good cause. Any challenge may be presented at the negotiation conference scheduled pursuant to section 26-13.5-105 via first-class mail or via an electronic communication method.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall have fifteen days from the date of receipt of the challenge to respond to a challenge based upon a mathematical or factual error. If a challenge results in a change to the monthly support obligation, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall provide an amended notice of review to the obligor and obligee. The parties shall be given fifteen days from the date of the amended notice of review to challenge the results of any subsequent review. The grounds for the challenge shall be limited to the issue of mathematical or factual error in the calculation of the monthly support obligation.

(1.9) If the review indicates that a change to the monthly support obligation is appropriate and the review is not challenged or all challenges have been addressed, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall file the notice of financial responsibility, the order of financial responsibility accompanied by the guideline worksheet, and the supporting financial documentation with the court.

A request for modification made pursuant to this section shall not stay the delegate child support enforcement unit from enforcing and collecting upon the existing order pending the modification proceeding.

Only payments accruing subsequent to the request for modification may be modified. Modification shall be based upon the standard set forth in section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1246, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 899, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 258, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1546, § 24, effective May 31.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (1.2), (1.3), (1.4), (1.5), (1.7), and (1.9) added, p. 1658, § 18, effective July 1, 2008.

L. 2018:

(1), (1.5), (1.7)(b), and (1.9) amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2333, § 12, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-113. Rules and regulations.

The state board shall adopt rules and regulations establishing uniform forms and procedures to implement the administrative process set forth in this article and may adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1246, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

26-13.5-114. Applicability of administrative procedure act.

Except for the promulgation of rules and regulations as authorized in section 26-13.5-113, the provisions of this article shall not be subject to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1246, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

26-13.5-115. Additional remedies.

The remedies created by this article are in addition to and not in substitution for any other existing remedies authorized by law to establish and enforce the duty of support.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1246, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

26-13.5-116. Attorney of record in administrative process action case.

If a party retains legal counsel to represent him or her in an APA case, a written notice of representation signed by both the party and his or her attorney must be received by the delegate child support enforcement unit. The notice of representation is not effective until delivered to the delegate child support enforcement unit.

If a party terminates legal representation, the party shall deliver written notice of such termination to the delegate child support enforcement unit. The termination is effective upon receipt of delivery.

Except for service of the notice upon the APA-respondent, an attorney of record must, on behalf of his or her client, receive a copy of all documents delivered to the parties in an APA case.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2335, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-117. Administrative process action case - rights of the parties.

An APA case may be conducted if the obligee or the obligor is an applicant for child support services pursuant to article 13 of this title 26.

Both parties have the right to a one-time standard continuance not to exceed seven days after the date of the currently scheduled negotiation conference.

Both parties have the right to contest paternity of a child if legal parentage of that child has not already been established by the court or by administrative order or determined pursuant to the laws of another state.

Both parties may attend and participate in an APA negotiation conference conducted pursuant to this article 13.5.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2335, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-118. Exchange and delivery of evidence.

All documents that are used in calculating the child support guidelines worksheet and administrative order must be provided to the other party at the time of or prior to the date and time of the currently scheduled negotiation conference.

If nondisclosure of information has been requested by a party pursuant to section 14-5-312 or 26-13-102.8, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall not disclose information relating to the location of the requesting party or the dependent child. Unless otherwise provided by law, if a party has not requested nondisclosure of information, the delegate child support enforcement unit has no duty to redact other information contained in the document. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall be held harmless for the release of such information pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2335, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-119. Request for court hearing - transfer of jurisdiction.

At any time after effecting service of process pursuant to section 26-13.5-104, the delegate child support enforcement unit may refer the case to court by requesting a court hearing for the establishment or modification of child support without additional service of process when:

The APA-respondent is incarcerated and does not participate in a negotiation conference or sign a stipulated order;

An alleged or presumed parent is excluded by genetic testing results pursuant to section 13-25-126;

A parent receives an adoption subsidy for a dependent child; or

Any other reason set forth in rule.

An APA-respondent may opt out of the APA proceedings and a court hearing must be scheduled pursuant to this section if, prior to the date and time of the currently scheduled negotiation conference, the APA-respondent delivers to the delegate child support enforcement unit a written request for a court hearing.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2336, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-120. Default order of modification.

If both parties fail to attend the currently scheduled negotiation conference on modification of a stipulated order or modification is not agreed to by the parties, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall enter a default order of modification.

To approve the default order of modification, the court shall confirm that the default order and all other documents required to be filed with the court pursuant to section 26-13.5-112 were in fact filed with the court. Prior to filing with the court, a supervisor, administrator, attorney, or county director of human or social services shall review the default order and other documents.

In approving a default order of modification, a court shall not:

Recalculate the amount of any child support obligation contained in the administrative order;

Schedule or conduct a court hearing; or

Require the filing of additional documents with the court.

If the court has not approved or denied approval of the default order within thirty-six days after filing with the court, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall notify the court that the deadline for approval or denial is in seven days on the forty-second day.

The court may conduct a judicial review of the default order of modification pursuant to section 26-13.5-107.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2336, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-121. When administrative process action order is effective.

An APA stipulated or temporary order of establishment or an APA stipulated order of modification is effective upon filing with the clerk of court.

An APA default order of establishment or an APA default order of modification is effective upon approval by the court or by operation of law pursuant to section 26-13.5-106 or 26-13.5-120.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2337, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-122. Survivability of an administrative process action order - applicability.

If an APA order is filed into a pending court case and that court case is subsequently dismissed, the APA order survives such dismissal and continues to be valid and enforceable unless the court specifically orders the dismissal of the APA order.

If an APA order contains a judgment establishing paternity, a judgment for child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, or for costs of collection as defined in section 26-13.5-102 (4), and the parents subsequently marry each other, such judgments survive the marriage and continue to be valid and enforceable.

This section applies even if only one parent is a party to the APA order and even if the APA order is for foster care placement fees.

If an APA order contains a judgment for retroactive support that is owed to a nonparent caretaker of a dependent child, such judgment survives pursuant to this section.

If the APA order establishes a monthly support obligation that is or has been assigned to the county, state, or other jurisdiction, that portion of the order for a monthly support obligation during the period of assignment survives pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2337, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-123. Where administrative process action order filed - electronic filing of order data - custodian of the record - applicability.

A stipulated, temporary, or default order must be filed with the clerk of the district court in the county in which the notice of financial responsibility was issued, or in the district court where an action relating to support is pending or where an order exists but is silent on the issue of child support.

A stipulated or default order of modification must be filed in the county and case where the initial APA order was filed.

In appropriate cases, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall transmit data elements of the order, return of service of process, and other APA documents to the clerk of the court in the county where the notice of financial responsibility was issued in lieu of filing the order and other documents with the court.

When the original order is not filed with the court, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall be the custodian of the record until the order is filed with the court.

This section applies to both establishment and modification cases.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2337, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.